Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.150

Informal dispute resolution settlement procedure.

If a manufacturer has established an informal dispute resolution settlement procedure which substantially complies with the applicable provision of Title 16, Code of Federal Regulations Part 703, as from time to time amended, a consumer may choose to first submit a dispute under this chapter to the informal dispute resolution settlement procedure.

[ 1989 c 347 s 8; 1987 c 344 s 14.]